en: Tilsit
bg: Тилзитер
de: Tilsiter
fi: Tilsiter
fr: Tilsit
hr: Tilsit
no: Tilsiter

en: String cheeses
ja: ストリングチーズ

en: Chechil
am: Chechil
hr: Čečil
ru: Чечил
tr: cecil

en: Smoked chechil
fr: Chechil fumé
hr: Dimljeni čečil
ru: Чечил копчёный

en: Half-aged mimolettes
fr: Mimolettes demi-vieilles
hr: Napola odležale mimolete
nl: Belegen mimolette

en: Extra old mimolettes
fr: Mimolettes extra vieilles
hr: Ekstra stare mimolette
nl: Extra oude mimolette

en: Young mimolettes
fr: Mimolettes jeunes
hr: Mlade mimolette
nl: Jonge mimolette

en: Old mimolettes
fr: Mimolettes vieilles
hr: Stare mimolette
nl: Oude mimolette

en: Soft cheeses with a red rind
fr: Fromages à croûte rouge
nl: Kazen met een rode korst, Roodschimmelkazen

en: Munster, Munster cheeses, Munster cheese from cow's milk
xx: Munsters, Munster
ar: مونستير
be: Мюнстэр
bg: Мюнстер
cv: Мюнстер
de: Münsterkäse
fr: Munsters, Munster, Munster-Géromé
id: Keju Munster
ja: マンステール
ko: 묑스테르
ms: Keju Munster
ru: Мюнстер
th: เมิงสแตร์ชีส
uk: Мюнстер
zh: 芒斯特芝士

en: Saint-Paulin cheese
fr: Saint-Paulin
hr: Sir Saint-Paulin
nl: Saint Paulin kazen

en: Munsters with raw milk
de: Münsterkäse mit Rohmilch
fr: Munsters au lait cru
hr: Mansteri sa sirovim mlijekom
nl: Rauwmelkse Munster

en: Pasteurised milk Munsters
de: Münsterkäse mit pasteurisierter Milch
fr: Munsters au lait pasteurisé
hr: Pasterizirano mlijeko munsters
nl: Gepasteuriseerde Munster

en: Camemberts de Normandie, Camemberts from Normandy
de: Camembert de Normandie
fi: Normandian Camembertit
fr: Camemberts de Normandie, Camembert de Normandie
hr: Camemberts iz Normandiea
it: Camembert di Normandia
nl: Camembert uit Normandië

en: Camemberts
xx: Camemberts
bg: Камамбер
de: Camembert
es: Camemberts
fi: Camembertit
fr: Camemberts
hr: Camemberts
hu: Camembertek, camembert sajtok
it: Camembert
ja: カマンベールチーズ
nl: Camemberts
ru: Сыр Камамбер

en: Buffalo camemberts
fr: Camemberts au lait de bufflonne

en: Camemberts from pasteurized buffalo milk
fr: Camemberts au lait pasteurisé de bufflonne

en: Camemberts from raw buffalo milk
fr: Camemberts au lait cru de bufflonne

en: Cow camemberts
fr: Camemberts au lait de vache

en: Camemberts from raw cow milk, Camemberts from raw milk, Camembert made with raw milk, Camembert cheese from cow's milk from raw milk
de: Camembert aus Rohmilch, Rohmilch-Camembert
fi: Camembert raakamaidosta
fr: Camemberts au lait cru de vache, Camemberts au lait cru, Camembert au lait cru
hr: Camemberta od sirovog kravljeg mlijeka
lt: Nepasterizuoti sūriai
nl: Rauwmelkse camemberts